South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S765.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: South Carolina Wildlife Law Enforcement Officers' Association payroll deduction SECTION 1.    Section 8-11-83 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (E) Dues for the South Carolina Wildlife Law Enforcement Officers' Association also may be deducted from the compensation of state employees and retirees and paid over to his association in the same manner other dues under this section are deducted and paid over. The same restrictions and conditions that apply to the other deductions under this same section also apply to the deduction of dues for the South Carolina Wildlife Law Enforcement Officers' Association. Time effective SECTION 2.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 15th day of May, 2026. Approved the 18th day of May, 2026. __________